Utah statutes.
32B-5-308.   Requirements on staff or others on premises -- Employing a minor.

(1)  Staff of a retail licensee, while on duty, may not:

(a)  consume an alcoholic product; or

(b)  be intoxicated.

(2) (a)  A retail licensee may not employ a minor to sell, offer for sale, furnish, or dispense an alcoholic product.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), unless otherwise prohibited in the provisions related to the specific type of retail license, a retail licensee may employ a minor who is at least 16 years of age to enter the sale at a cash register or other sales recording device.

